Washington statutes.
RCW 35.06.010

Population requirements for advance in classification.

A city or town which has at least ten thousand inhabitants may become a first-class city by adopting a charter under Article XI, section 10, of the state Constitution in chapter 35.22 RCW.

A town which has at least fifteen hundred inhabitants may reorganize and advance its classification to become a second-class city as provided in this chapter.

[ 1994 c 81 s 7; 1965 c 7 s 35.06.010. Prior: 1955 c 319 s 6; prior: (i) 1907 c 248 s 1, part; 1890 p 140 s 12, part; RRS s 8933, part. (ii) 1890 p 141 s 14; RRS s 8936.]